Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1206.03
Critical care paramedic practice of emergency medical care, defined.

Critical care paramedic practice of emergency medical care means care provided by a paramedic in accordance with the knowledge and skill acquired through successful completion of an approved program for a critical care paramedic. Such care includes, but is not limited to, (1) all of the acts that a paramedic is licensed to perform, (2) advanced clinical patient assessment, (3) intravenous infusions, and (4) complex interventions, treatments, and pharmacological interventions used to treat critically ill or injured patients within the critical care environment, including transport.

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 17.